Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2189
Encumbrances; evidence before referee.

In taking such proof he may receive, with other evidence, the affidavit of the parties interested.

R.S.1867, Code § 822, p. 540;

R.S.1913, § 8305;

C.S.1922, § 9257;

C.S.1929, § 20-2189;

R.S.1943, § 25-2189.